Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6117
Compensation.

(1)(a) No director, officer, employee, or agent of the mutual insurer and no other person shall receive any fee, commission, or other valuable consideration whatsoever, other than his or her usual regular salary and compensation, for in any manner aiding, promoting, or assisting in a plan of conversion except as set forth in the plan of conversion approved by the director.

(b) Subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall not prohibit a management-incentive compensation program which is contained in the plan of conversion and approved by the director to be adopted upon conversion to the new stock insurer or prohibit such a program to be later adopted by the new stock insurer.

(c) All fees, commissions, compensation, and valuable consideration described in this subsection shall be subject to the restrictions on salary, compensation, and emoluments in section 44-213.

(2) Subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to attorneys, accountants, actuaries, and investment bankers for services performed in the independent practice of their professions even though any such person is also a member of the board of directors of the mutual insurer.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 57;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 14.